zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 打猎与射击 > 软弹气枪 > 软弹气枪护具: 软弹气枪手套; 软气枪护目镜和面罩配件; 软弹气枪护目镜和面罩; 软气枪头盔配件; 软气枪头盔; 软弹气枪护垫; 软弹气枪背心
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Lov i streljaštvo > Airsoft > Zaštitna oprema za airsoft: Rukavice za airsoft; Dodaci za naočale i maske za airsoft; Naočale i maske za airsoft; Dodaci za kacige za airsoft; Kacige za airsoft; Štitnici za airsoft; Prsluci za airsoft
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Caza y tiro > Airsoft > Equipamiento de protección para Airsoft: Guantes para Airsoft; Accesorios para gafas y máscaras de airsoft; Gafas protectoras y máscaras para Airsoft; Accesorios para cascos de airsoft; Cascos de airsoft; Almohadillas de protección para Airsoft; Chalecos para Airsoft
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Chasse et tir > Airsoft > Équipements de protection pour airsoft: Gants pour airsoft; Accessoires de masques et lunettes d'airsoft; Lunettes et masques pour airsoft; Accessoires pour casques d’airsoft; Casques d’airsoft; Coussinets pour airsoft; Gilets pour airsoft
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Metsästys ja ammunta > Airsoft > Airsoft-suojavarusteet: Airsoft-käsineet; Airsoft-suojalasien ja -maskien lisävarusteet; Airsoft-suojalasit ja -naamarit; Airsoft-kypärien tarvikkeet; Airsoft-kypärät; Airsoft-tyynyt; Airsoft-liivit
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Poľovníctvo a streľba > Airsoft > Airsoftové ochranné vybavenie: Airsoftové rukavice; Príslušenstvo pre airsoftové okuliare a masky; Airsoftové okuliare a masky; Príslušenstvo pre airsoftové prilby; Airsoftové prilby; Airsoftové chrániče; Airsoftové vesty
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Săn bắn > Súng hơi hạng nhẹ > Thiết bị bảo vệ súng hơi hạng nhẹ: Găng tay súng hơi hạng nhẹ; Phụ kiện mặt nạ và kính bảo hộ airsoft; Kính và mặt nạ súng hơi hạng nhẹ; Phụ kiện mũ bảo hiểm airsoft; Mũ bảo hiểm airsoft; Đệm súng hơi hạng nhẹ; Áo khoác súng hơi hạng nhẹ
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 사냥/사격 > 에어소프트 > 에어소프트 보호 장비: 에어소프트 장갑; 에어소프트 고글 및 마스크 액세서리; 에어소프트 고글/마스크; 에어소프트 헬멧 액세서리; 에어소프트 헬멧; 에어소프트 패드; 에어소프트 조끼
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 打獵和射擊 > 生存遊戲 > 軟彈氣槍護具: 軟彈氣槍手套; 軟氣槍護目鏡與面罩配件; 軟彈氣槍護目鏡和面罩; 軟氣槍頭盔配件; 軟氣槍頭盔; 軟彈氣槍護墊; 軟彈氣槍背心
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Κυνήγι & σκοποβολή > Airsoft > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός Airsoft: Γάντια Airsoft; Αξεσουάρ για γυαλιά & μάσκες Airsoft; Γυαλιά & μάσκες Airsoft; Αξεσουάρ για κράνη Airsoft; Κράνη Airsoft; Επιθέματα Airsoft; Γιλέκα Airsoft
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Medžioklė ir šaudymas > Šratasvydis > Šratasvydžio apsauginės priemonės: Šratasvydžio pirštinės; „Airsoft“ akinių ir kaukių priedai; Šratasvydžio akiniai ir kaukės; „Airsoft“ šalmo priedai; „Airsoft“ šalmai; Šratasvydžio apsaugos; Šratasvydžio liemenės
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Охота и стрельба > Страйкбол > Защитная экипировка для страйкбола: Перчатки для страйкбола; Аксессуары для страйкбольных очков и масок; Очки и маски для страйкбола; Аксессуары для страйкбольных шлемов; Страйкбольные шлемы; Наколенники и налокотники для страйкбола; Жилеты для страйкбола
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Myślistwo i strzelectwo > ASG > Sprzęt ochronny do ASG: Rękawice do ASG; Akcesoria do gogli i masek ASG; Gogle i maski do ASG; Akcesoria do hełmów ASG; Hełmy ASG; Ochraniacze do ADSG; Kamizelki do ASG
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Jagen und Schießen > Softair > Airsoft-Schutzkleidung: Airsoft-Handschuhe; Zubehör für Airsoft-Brillen & -Masken; Airsoft-Schutzbrillen und -Masken; Airsoft-Helmzubehör; Airsoft-Helme; Airsoft-Polster; Airsoft-Westen
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Vadászat és lövészet > Airsoft > Airsoft védőfelszerelés: Airsoft kesztyűk; Airsoft védőszemüveg- és maszk-kiegészítők; Airsoft szemüvegek és maszkok; Airsoft sisakkiegészítők; Airsoft sisakok; Airsoft betétek; Airsoft mellények
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Jakt og skyting > Luftpistol > Beskyttelsesutstyr til airsoft: Hansker til airsoft; Tilbehør til beskyttelsesbriller og masker for airsoft; Briller og masker til airsoft; Tilbehør til airsofthjelmer; Airsofthjelmer; Beskyttelsesputer til airsoft; Vester til airsoft
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Caccia e tiro a segno > Airsoft > Equipaggiamento protettivo per softair: Guanti da softair; Accessori per maschere e occhiali da softair; Occhiali e maschere per softair; Accessori per elmetti da softair; Elmetti da softair; Cuscinetti per softair; Gilet da softair
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Jagen en schieten > Airsoft > Beschermende uitrusting voor airsoft: Airsoft handschoenen; Accessoires voor airsoftbrillen en -maskers; Brillen en maskers voor airsoft; Accessoires voor airsofthelmen; Airsofthelmen; Airsoft beschermers; Airsoft vesten
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Jakt och skytte > Airsoft > Skyddsutrustning för airsoft: Airsoft-handskar; Tillbehör för skyddsglasögon och masker till airsoft; Skyddsglasögon och masker för airsoft; Tillbehör till airsofthjälmar; Airsofthjälmar; Airsoft-skydd; Airsoft-västar
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Lov in streljanje > Airsoft > Zaščitna oprema za airsoft: Airsoft rokavice; Dodatki za očala in maske za Airsoft; Airsoft očala in maske; Dodatki za Airsoft čelade; Airsoft čelade; Airsoft blazinice; Airsoft jopiči
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Vânătoare și tir > Aer comprimat > Echipamente de protecție pentru tir cu arme cu aer comprimat: Mănuși pentru tir cu arme cu aer comprimat; Accesorii pentru ochelari și măști de airsoft; Ochelari și măști pentru tir cu arme cu aer comprimat; Accesorii pentru căști de airsoft; Căști de airsoft; Inserții pentru tir cu arme cu aer comprimat; Veste pentru tir cu arme cu aer comprimat
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Лов и стрелба > Страйкбол > Защитна екипировка за страйкбол: Ръкавици за страйкбол; Аксесоари за еърсофт маски и очила; Очила и маски за страйкбол; Аксесоари за каски за страйкбол; Каски за страйкбол; Протектори за страйкбол; Тактически жилетки за страйкбол
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 狩猟・射撃 > エアソフト用品 > エアソフト用プロテクター: エアソフト用グローブ; エアソフト用ゴーグル＆マスクアクセサリー; エアソフト用ゴーグル＆マスク; エアソフト用ヘルメットアクセサリー; エアソフト用ヘルメット; エアソフト用パッド; エアソフト用ベスト
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Jagt og skydning > Airsoft > Beskyttelsesudstyr til airsoft: Airsofthandsker; Tilbehør til airsoft-briller og -masker; Masker og briller til airsoft; Tilbehør til airsofthjelme; Airsofthjelme; Airsoftpads; Airsoftveste
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Caça e tiro > Airsoft > Equipamento de proteção para airsoft: Luvas para airsoft; Acessórios para óculos e máscaras de airsoft; Máscaras e óculos para airsoft; Acessórios para capacetes de airsoft; Capacetes de airsoft; Almofadas para airsoft; Coletes para airsoft
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Caça e tiro > Airsoft > Equipamento de proteção para airsoft: Luvas de airsoft; Acessórios para óculos e máscaras de airsoft; Óculos e máscaras de airsoft; Acessórios para capacetes de airsoft; Capacetes de airsoft; Almofadas de airsoft; Coletes de airsoft
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Avcılık ve Atıcılık > Airsoft > Airsoft Koruyucu Kıyafetleri: Airsoft Eldivenleri; Airsoft gözlük ve maske aksesuarları; Airsoft Gözlükleri ve Maskeleri; Airsoft kask aksesuarları; Airsoft kaskları; Airsoft Pedleri; Airsoft yelekleri
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Hunting & Shooting > Airsoft > Airsoft Protective Gear: Airsoft Gloves; Airsoft Goggle & Mask Accessories; Airsoft Goggles & Masks; Airsoft Helmet Accessories; Airsoft Helmets; Airsoft Pads; Airsoft Vests
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การล่าสัตว์และยิงปืน > แอร์ซอฟท์ > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันปืนแอร์ซอฟท์: ถุงมือสำหรับปืนแอร์ซอฟท์; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับแว่นตาและหน้ากากแอร์ซอฟต์; แว่นตาและหน้ากากสำหรับปืนแอร์ซอฟท์; อุปกรณ์เสริมหมวกกันน็อกแอร์ซอฟต์; หมวกกันน็อกแอร์ซอฟต์; สนับป้องกันสำหรับปืนแอร์ซอฟท์; เสื้อเกราะสำหรับปืนแอร์ซอฟท์
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lov a střelba > Airsoft > Airsoftové chrániče: Airsoftové rukavice; Příslušenství k airsoftovým brýlím a maskám; Airsoftové brýle a masky; Příslušenství k airsoftovým helmám; Airsoftové helmy; Airsofové chrániče; Airsoftové vesty